North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 9. Foreign Limited Partnerships.

§ 59-901.
Law governing.

Subject to the Constitution of this State, (i) the laws of the jurisdiction under which a foreign limited partnership is organized govern its organization and internal affairs and the liability of its partners, and (ii) a foreign limited partnership may not be denied registration by reason of any difference between those laws and the laws of this State.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 34.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Creation of North Carolina’s Limited Liability Corporation Act,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 179 (1997).

§ 59-902.
Registration.

Before transacting business in this State, a foreign limited partnership shall procure a certificate of authority to transact business in this State from the Secretary of State. No foreign limited partnership shall be entitled to transact in this State any business which a limited partnership organized under this Article is not permitted to transact. In order to register, a foreign limited partnership shall deliver to the Secretary of State an application for registration as a foreign limited partnership, signed by a general partner and setting forth:

The name of the foreign limited partnership and, if different, the name under which it proposes to register and transact business in this State;

The jurisdiction and date of its formation;

The date of formation and the period of duration;

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the principal office of the foreign limited partnership, and the county in which the principal office is located;

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the registered office of the foreign limited partnership in this State, the county in which the registered office is located, and the name of its proposed registered agent in this State;

If the certificate of limited partnership filed in the foreign limited partnership’s state of organization is not required to include the names and addresses of the partners, a list of the names and addresses or, at the election of the foreign limited partnership, a list of the names and addresses of the general partners and the address, including county and city or town, and street and number, of the office at which is kept a list of the names and addresses of the limited partners and their capital contributions, together with an undertaking by the foreign limited partnership to keep such records until such foreign limited partnership’s registration in this State is cancelled;

A statement that in consideration of the issuance of a certificate of authority to transact business in this State, the foreign limited partnership appoints the Secretary of State of North Carolina as the agent to receive service of process, notice, or demand, whenever the foreign limited partnership fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this State or whenever any such registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office;

The names and addresses including county and city or town, and street and number, if any, of all of the general partners;

(8a)

Whether the foreign limited partnership is a foreign limited liability partnership; and

The effective date and time of the registration if it is not to be effective at the time of filing of the application.

Without excluding other activities which shall not constitute transacting business in this State, a foreign limited partnership shall not be considered to be transacting business in this State, for the purpose of this Article, by reason of carrying on in this State any one or more of the following activities:

Maintaining or defending any action or suit or any administrative or arbitration proceeding, or effecting the settlement thereof or the settlement of claims or disputes;

Holding meetings of its partners or carrying on other activities concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts or borrowing money in this State, with or without security, even if such borrowings are repeated and continuous transactions;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of its securities, or appointing and maintaining trustees or depositaries with relation to its securities;

Soliciting or procuring orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, where such orders require acceptance without this State before becoming binding contracts;

Making or investing in loans with or without security including servicing of mortgages or deeds of trust through independent agencies within the State, the conducting of foreclosure proceedings and sale, the acquiring of property at foreclosure sale and the management and rental of such property for a reasonable time while liquidating its investment, provided no office or agency therefor is maintained in this State;

Taking security for or collecting debts due to it or enforcing any rights in property securing the same;

Transacting business in interstate commerce; and

Conducting an isolated transaction completed within a period of six months and not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of like nature.

Each foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this State must maintain a registered agent as required by Article 4 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes and is subject to service on the Secretary of State under that Article.

through (e) Repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 50(b), effective January 1, 2002.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1987, c. 531, s. 8.1; 2000-140, s. 55; 2001-358, s. 50(c); 2001-387, ss. 134, 159, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2001-487, s. 62(y).

§ 59-903.
Issuance of registration.

If the Secretary of State finds that an application satisfies the requirements of this Article, the Secretary shall, when all requisite fees have been tendered as in this Article prescribed:

Endorse on the application the word “filed”, and the hour, day, month and year of the filing thereof;

File in the office of the Secretary of State the application;

Issue a certificate of authority to transact business in this State to which the Secretary shall affix the conformed copy of the application; and

Send to the foreign limited partnership or its representative the certificate of authority, together with the conformed copy of the application affixed thereto.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1987, c. 531, s. 8; 1997-485, s. 27; 1999-362, s. 35.

§ 59-904.
Name.

A foreign limited partnership may register with the Secretary of State under any name that meets the requirements of Article 3 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 2001-358, s. 35; 2001-387, ss. 135, 155, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 59-905.
Changes and amendments.

If any statement in the application for registration of a foreign limited partnership was false when made or any arrangements or other facts described have changed, making the application inaccurate in any respect, the foreign limited partnership shall promptly file in the office of the Secretary of State an original and one conformed copy of a certificate, signed by a general partner, correcting such statement.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-906.
Cancellation of registration.

A foreign limited partnership may cancel its registration by filing with the Secretary of State a certificate of cancellation signed by a general partner. A cancellation does not terminate the authority of the Secretary of State to accept service of process on the foreign limited partnership with respect to causes of action arising out of the transactions of business in this State.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-907.
Transaction of business without registration.

No foreign limited partnership transacting business in this State without permission obtained through a certificate of authority under this Article shall be permitted to maintain any action or proceeding in any court of this State unless such foreign limited partnership shall have obtained a certificate of authority prior to trial.

The failure of a foreign limited partnership to obtain a certificate of authority to transact business in this State shall not impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited partnership and shall not prevent the foreign limited partnership from defending any action or proceeding in any court of this State.

A foreign limited partnership failing to obtain permission to transact business in this State as required by this Article or by prior statutes then applicable shall be liable to the State for the years or parts thereof during which it transacted business in this State without such permission in an amount equal to all fees and taxes which would have been imposed by law upon such foreign limited partnership had it duly applied for and received such permission plus interest and all penalties imposed by law for failure to pay such fees and taxes, plus five hundred dollars ($500.00) and costs. The Attorney General shall bring actions to recover all amounts due the State under the provisions of this section.

The Secretary of State is hereby directed to require that every foreign limited partnership transacting business in this State comply with the provisions of this Article. The Secretary of State is authorized to employ such assistants as shall be deemed necessary in his office for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this Article and for making such investigations as shall be necessary to ascertain foreign limited partnerships now transacting business in this State which may have failed to comply with the provisions of this Article.

A limited partner of a foreign limited partnership is not liable as a general partner of the foreign limited partnership solely by reason of the foreign limited partnership’s having transacted business in this State without registration.

A foreign limited partnership, by transacting business in this State without registration, appoints the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process with respect to causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in this State.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 36; 2000-140, s. 101(r).

§ 59-908.
Action by Attorney General.

The Attorney General may bring an action to restrain a foreign limited partnership from transacting business in this State in violation of this Article.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-909.
Withdrawal of foreign limited partnership by reason of a merger, consolidation, or conversion.

Whenever a foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this State ceases its separate existence as a result of a statutory merger or consolidation permitted by the laws of the state or country under which it was organized, or converts into another type of entity as permitted by those laws, the surviving or resulting entity shall apply for a certificate of withdrawal for the foreign limited partnership by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a copy of the articles of merger, consolidation, or conversion or a certificate reciting the facts of the merger, consolidation, or conversion, duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of limited partnership records in the state or country under the laws of which the foreign limited partnership was organized. If the surviving or resulting entity is not authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State, the articles or certificate must be accompanied by an application which must set forth:

The name of the foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this State, the type of entity and name of the surviving or resulting entity, and a statement that the surviving or resulting entity is not authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State;

A statement that the surviving or resulting entity consents that service of process based on any cause of action arising in this State, or arising out of business transacted in this State, during the time the foreign limited partnership was authorized to transact business in this State, may thereafter be made by service thereof on the Secretary of State;

A mailing address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process served upon the Secretary under subdivision (a)(2) of this section; and

A commitment to file with the Secretary of State a statement of any subsequent change in its mailing address.

If the Secretary of State finds that the articles or certificate and the application for withdrawal, if required, conform to law, the Secretary of State shall:

Endorse on the articles or certificate and the application for withdrawal, if required, the word “filed” and the hour, day, month, and year of filing thereof;

File the articles or certificate and the application, if required;

Issue a certificate of withdrawal; and

Send to the surviving or resulting entity or its representative the certificate of withdrawal, together with the exact or conformed copy of the application, if required, affixed thereto.

After the withdrawal of the foreign limited partnership is effective, service of process on the Secretary of State in accordance with subsection (a) of this section shall be made by delivering to and leaving with the Secretary of State, or with any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process, duplicate copies of the process and the fee required by G.S. 59-1106(b). Upon receipt of process in the manner provided in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall immediately mail a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the surviving or resulting entity at the mailing address designated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History.

1999-369, s. 4.7; 2001-387, ss. 136, 137; 2001-487, s. 62(z).

§§ 59-910 through 59-1000.

Reserved for future codification purposes.